North Carolina, session 2025, HB1207.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

MUNICIPAL WINTER ROAD REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM.
SECTION 1. Chapter 136 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 14D.
"Municipal Winter Road Operations Cost Share Program.
"§ 136-189.30. Municipal Winter Road Operations Cost Share Program.
(a) Creation. – The Municipal Winter Road Operations Cost Share Program ("the
Program") is established within the Department of Transportation. The Department shall
administer the Program and reimburse municipalities in accordance with this Article.
(b) Purpose. — The purpose of this Article is to improve municipal preparedness and
response for snow and ice events by supporting the acquisition of equipment, staffing readiness,
and coordinated contracting for snow and ice removal on municipal streets and public
rights-of-way.
(c) Allowable Reimbursements. — The Department may reimburse up to seventy-five
percent (75%) of the following costs incurred by a municipality:
*H1207-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Outfitting municipal sanitation trucks, dump trucks, or other heavy-duty
municipal vehicles with snow plows, salt spreaders, or liquid de-icing
systems;
(2) Installation of required cameras, GPS tracking devices, and associated data
systems;
(3) Operational costs directly related to snow and ice response, including staffing,
training, fuel, materials, and contracted services; and
(4) Payments to contracted private snow-removal providers as required under this
Article.
(e) Contracting requirement. — As a condition of receiving reimbursement under this
Article, a municipality shall contract with one or more private service providers located within
the State that are capable of performing snow and ice removal using appropriately equipped
vehicles, to provide supplemental snow and ice removal services. Nothing in this subsection shall
be construed to prohibit reimbursement for snow and ice removal performed by municipal
departments or other public municipal services, provided such services meet the requirements of
this Article.
(1) Accumulation of winter precipitation of at least 1 inch of snow or .1 inch of
ice and
(2) Forecasted temperatures are expected to remain below freezing after sunrise
on the following day.
The Department may adopt rules establishing minimum contractual standards,
including response time, equipment requirements, and documentation.
(f) Equipment and data requirements. — Any municipal or contracted vehicle funded in
whole or in part under this Article shall be equipped with:
(1) Forward-and-plow-facing cameras capable of recording operations; and
(2) GPS tracking devices capable of recording route coverage, duration, and time
stamps.
Data collected under this section shall be used for:
(1) Verification of services performed;
(2) Billing and reimbursement documentation; and
(3) Operational transparency for municipal officials.
(g) Public plowing status map. — As a condition of receiving reimbursement under this
Article, a municipality shall provide a publicly accessible, real-time or near-real-time map
showing snow and ice removal activity on municipal streets, including plowed and in-progress
routes, using GPS data.
(h) Application and prioritization. — The Department shall develop an application
process requiring municipalities to submit:
(1) Winter road operations plan;
(2) Proposed equipment acquisitions;
(3) Contracted service arrangements; and
(4) Documentation of the required local match.
(i) In reimbursing allowable costs under this article, the Department shall consider:
(1) Amount of local match provided;
(2) Population served and commercial activity affected;
(3) Demonstrated need and existing capacity; and
(4) Geographic distribution of awards.
(5) High ratio of municipal to NCDOT-maintained roads.
(j) Reporting. — The Department shall submit an annual report to the Joint Legislative
Transportation Oversight Committee detailing:
(1) Reimbursements;
(2) Funds expended;
Page 2 House Bill 1207-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Municipal participation; and
(4) Observed impacts on winter road response."
SECTION 2. The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in recurring funds is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Transportation for each fiscal year
beginning with the 2026–2027 fiscal year to support operational costs under this Article.
The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 2026–2027 fiscal year to support the
acquisition and installation of snow and ice-removal equipment under this Article. Funds
appropriated under this section shall not revert and shall remain available for expenditure until
expended.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of five million dollars($5,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds to be used by the Department to build up a salt and brine reserve to distribute
to local governments in need, with priority given based on need, geography, and population.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
House Bill 1207-First Edition Page 3